Massachusetts, session 194th, H5341.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 94 of chapter 143 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (i) and inserting in place thereof
the following:-
(i) To issue licenses to individuals engaged as construction supervisors. Fees for such
licenses shall be collected and retained by the commonwealth; provided, however, that in
addition to any licenses issued under this subsection, the board may issue a construction
supervisor license for heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems with less than a 10-ton
capacity limited to the direct supervision of persons engaged in the installation, repair, and
maintenance of such systems.
SECTION 2. Said section 94 of said chapter 143, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out subsection (n), and inserting in place thereof the following:-
(n) To establish a continuing education advisory council to assist and make
recommendations to the board relative to the formulation, promulgation and administration of
of 2

requirements for the continuing education of individuals licensed as construction supervisors.
The council shall consist of: the commissioner of the division of occupational licensure, or his
designee; 2 licensed construction supervisors who shall also be members of the Home Builders
Association of Massachusetts; 2 licensed construction supervisors who shall also be members of
the Air Conditioning Association of New England; 1 licensed construction supervisor who shall
also be a member of the eastern Massachusetts chapter of the National Association of the
Remodeling Industry; and 3 members to be appointed by the commissioner, 2 of whom shall be
certified building inspectors and 1 of whom shall be an instructor in residential construction
technology at a public or private teaching institution. The commissioner shall be chairperson of
the council which shall meet regularly and may establish its own rules for the conduct of its
business. The members of the council shall not be compensated for their services but shall be
reimbursed for travel and other expenses necessary for the performance of their duties. The
board may provide technical and clerical assistance to the council.
of 2